Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.100

Lien for utility services.

Code cities owning or operating waterworks or electric light distribution or power plants shall have a lien for such utility services as provided by RCW 35.21.290 for cities owning such plants and as limited therein, which lien may be enforced only as provided in RCW 35.21.300.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.100.]